District of Columbia statutes.
7-2601

Reports by physicians and institutions required.

Any physician in the District of Columbia, including persons licensed under Chapter 12 of Title 3, having reasonable cause to believe that a person brought to him or coming before him for examination, care, or treatment has suffered injury caused by a firearm, whether self-inflicted, accidental, or occurring during the commission of a crime, or has suffered injury caused by any dangerous weapon in the commission of a crime, shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with this chapter; provided, that when a physician in the performance of service as a member of the staff of a hospital or similar institution attends any person so injured, he shall notify the person in charge of the hospital or institution or his designated agent who shall report or cause reports to be made in accordance with this chapter.

Nov. 6, 1966, 80 Stat. 1355, Pub. L. 89-776, § 1
May 10, 1989, D.C. Law 7-231, § 7, 36 DCR 492
This section is referenced in § 14-307.
1981 Ed., § 2-1361.
1973 Ed., § 2-181.